South Dakota, session 2026, HB1226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 7-8:
A board of county commissioners may adopt investigatory and oversight policies
related to any department, or non-elected employee, or officer of the county. If the board
adopts a policy pursuant to this section, the policy must:
(1) Establish procedures for investigating non-elected county employees and officers
alleged to have committed or engaged in abuse of authority, chronic absenteeism,
conflicts of interest, insubordination, neglect of duties, nepotism, or any of the
conduct constituting grounds for removal of an officer pursuant to § 3-17-6;
(2) Designate which employees, officers, and third persons may conduct investigations
under the policy, and require that at least one investigator is from outside the
department that is the subject of the complaint;
(3) Provide standards for confidentiality and due process; and
(4) Comply with the process set forth in §§ 3-17-6 to 3-17-11, inclusive.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.